Maine, session 132, LD1067.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA §9094-A, sub-§3-A, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 378, §4, is
amended to read:
3-A. Group of mobile home owners or a mobile home owners' association
purchase. The owner of a mobile home park shall consider any offer received before the
60th day after the date the notice was mailed as required by subsection 1 from a group of
mobile home owners or a mobile home owners' association, as long as the mobile home
owners of at least 51% 60% of the mobile homes in the mobile home park that are occupied
by the mobile home owner or a family member of the mobile home owner sign a petition
or otherwise indicate in writing that they support making the offer. The owner of the
mobile home park shall negotiate in good faith with the group of mobile home owners or
the mobile home owners' association concerning a purchase pursuant to an offer made
under this subsection. For the purposes of this subsection, negotiating in good faith does
not require the owner of a mobile home park to accept an offer to purchase made by a group
of mobile home owners or the mobile home owners' association. An offer made by the
group of mobile home owners or the mobile home owners' association must include a
purchase and sale agreement. If the owner of the mobile home park accepts the offer of
the group of mobile home owners or the mobile home owners' association, the group of
mobile home owners or the mobile home owners' association must obtain appropriate
financing before the 90th day after the execution date of the purchase and sale agreement.
Sec. 2. 10 MRSA §9094-A, sub-§6 is enacted to read:
6. Solicitation of mobile home owners. A mobile home owners' association may not
contact a mobile home owner in the mobile home park more than 3 times about the mobile
home owners' association purchasing the mobile home park.